Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-825
Nuisance; existence; order of abatement; closing order.

If the existence of a nuisance is admitted or established in an action as provided for in sections 28-807 to 28-829, an order of abatement shall be entered as a part of the judgment in the case, which order shall direct the removal from the place of all personal property and contents used in conducting the nuisance, and not already released under authority of the court as provided in section 28-823, and shall direct the sale of such thereof as belonging to the defendants notified or appearing in the manner provided for the sale of personal property under execution. Such order shall also require the renewal for one year of any bond furnished by the owner of the real property as provided for in sections 28-807 to 28-829 or, if not so furnished, shall continue for one year any closing order issued at the time of the granting of the temporary injunction or, if no such closing order was then issued, shall include an order directing the effectual closing of the place against its use for any illegal purpose unless otherwise released. The owner of any place closed and not released under bond may then appear and obtain such release in the manner and upon fulfilling the requirements provided for in sections 28-807 to 28-829. The release of the property under this section shall not release it from any judgment, lien, penalty, or liability to which it may be subject. Owners of unsold personal property and contents so seized may appear and claim the same within ten days after such order of abatement is made and prove innocence to the satisfaction of the court of any knowledge of such use thereof and that with reasonable care and diligence they could not have known thereof. Every defendant in the action is presumed to have had knowledge of the general reputation of the place. If such innocence is established, such unsold personal property and contents shall be delivered to the owner, otherwise it shall be sold as provided in this section and all consideration received is recoverable as damages to the county where the nuisance was located.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 181;

Laws 1978, LB 748, § 14.